Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.60.080

Impersonating a census taker.

(1) A person is guilty of impersonating a census taker if the person falsely represents that he or she is a census taker with the intent to:

(a) Interfere with the operation of the census;

(b) Obtain information; or

(c) Obtain consent to enter a private dwelling.

(2) Impersonating a census taker is a gross misdemeanor.

[ 2020 c 34 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2020 c 34: See note following RCW 43.62.060.